Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska25-1535
Sale of lands and chattels; printer's fees; officer must demand.

Before any officer shall be excused from giving the notification mentioned in section 25-1534 he shall demand of the party for whose benefit the execution was issued, his agent or attorney, provided either of them resides in the county, the fees in said section specified.

R.S.1867, Code § 502, p. 479;

R.S.1913, § 8081;

C.S.1922, § 9017;

C.S.1929, § 20-1535;

R.S.1943, § 25-1535.